Illinois, session 104th, SB1545.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Animal Welfare Act is amended by changing 5Sections 2 and 10 as follows: 6    (225 ILCS 605/2)  (from Ch. 8, par. 302)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act unless the 8context otherwise requires:9    "Department" means the Illinois Department of Agriculture.10    "Director" means the Director of the Illinois Department 11of Agriculture.12    "Pet shop operator" means any person who sells, offers to 13sell, exchange, or offers for adoption with or without charge 14or donation dogs, cats, birds, fish, reptiles, or other 15animals customarily obtained as pets in this State at retail 16to the public. However, a person who sells only such animals 17that he has produced and raised shall not be considered a pet 18shop operator under this Act, and a veterinary hospital or 19clinic operated by a veterinarian or veterinarians licensed 20under the Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 21shall not be considered a pet shop operator under this Act.22    "Dog dealer" means any person who sells, offers to sell, 23exchange, or offers for adoption with or without charge or   SB1545- 2 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1donation dogs in this State. However, a person who sells dogs 2at retail to the public or only dogs that he has produced and 3raised shall not be considered a dog dealer under this Act, and 4a veterinary hospital or clinic operated by a veterinarian or 5veterinarians licensed under the Veterinary Medicine and 6Surgery Practice Act of 2004 shall not be considered a dog 7dealer under this Act.8    "Secretary of Agriculture" or "Secretary" means the 9Secretary of Agriculture of the United States Department of 10Agriculture.11    "Person" means any person, firm, corporation, partnership, 12association or other legal entity, any public or private 13institution, the State of Illinois, or any municipal 14corporation or political subdivision of the State.15    "Kennel operator" means any person who operates an 16establishment, other than an animal control facility, 17veterinary hospital, or animal shelter, where dogs or dogs and 18cats are maintained for boarding, training or similar purposes 19for a fee or compensation.20    "Boarding" means a time frame greater than 12 hours or an 21overnight period during which an animal is kept by a kennel 22operator. 23    "Cat breeder" means a person who sells, offers to sell, 24exchanges, or offers for adoption with or without charge cats 25that he or she has produced and raised. A person who owns, has 26possession of, or harbors 5 or less females capable of   SB1545- 3 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1reproduction shall not be considered a cat breeder. 2    "Dog breeder" means a person who sells, offers to sell, 3exchanges, or offers for adoption with or without charge dogs 4that he has produced and raised. A person who owns, has 5possession of, or harbors 5 or less females capable of 6reproduction shall not be considered a dog breeder. 7    "Animal control facility" means any facility operated by 8or under contract for the State, county, or any municipal 9corporation or political subdivision of the State for the 10purpose of impounding or harboring seized, stray, homeless, 11abandoned or unwanted dogs, cats, and other animals. "Animal 12control facility" also means any veterinary hospital or clinic 13operated by a veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the 14Veterinary Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 which 15operates for the above mentioned purpose in addition to its 16customary purposes.17    "Animal shelter" means a facility operated, owned, or 18maintained by a duly incorporated humane society, animal 19welfare society, or other non-profit organization having 20tax-exempt status under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal 21Revenue Code for the purpose of providing for and promoting 22the welfare, protection, and humane treatment of animals. An 23organization that does not have its own building that 24maintains animals solely in foster homes or other licensees is 25an "animal shelter" for purposes of this Act. "Animal shelter" 26also means any veterinary hospital or clinic operated by a   SB1545- 4 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1veterinarian or veterinarians licensed under the Veterinary 2Medicine and Surgery Practice Act of 2004 which operates for 3the above mentioned purpose in addition to its customary 4purposes. However, a person who sells dogs at retail to the 5public shall not be considered an animal shelter under this 6Act. 7    "Day care operator" means a person who operates an 8establishment, other than an animal control facility, 9veterinary hospital, or animal shelter, where dogs or dogs and 10cats are kept for a period of time not exceeding 12 hours. 11    "Foster home" means an entity that accepts the 12responsibility for stewardship of animals that are the 13obligation of an animal shelter or animal control facility, 14not to exceed 4 foster animals or 2 litters under 8 weeks of 15age at any given time. A written agreement to operate as a 16"foster home" shall be contracted with the animal shelter or 17animal control facility.18    "Guard dog service" means an entity that, for a fee, 19furnishes or leases guard or sentry dogs for the protection of 20life or property. A person is not a guard dog service solely 21because he or she owns a dog and uses it to guard his or her 22home, business, or farmland.23    "Guard dog" means a type of dog used primarily for the 24purpose of defending, patrolling, or protecting property or 25life at a commercial establishment other than a farm. "Guard 26dog" does not include stock dogs used primarily for handling   SB1545- 5 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1and controlling livestock or farm animals, nor does it include 2personally owned pets that also provide security.3    "Return" in return to field or trap, neuter, return 4program means to return the cat to field after it has been 5sterilized and vaccinated for rabies. 6    "Sentry dog" means a dog trained to work without 7supervision in a fenced facility other than a farm, and to 8deter or detain unauthorized persons found within the 9facility.10    "Probationary status" means the 12-month period following 11a series of violations of this Act during which any further 12violation shall result in an automatic 12-month suspension of 13licensure. 14    "Owner" means any person having a right of property in an 15animal, who keeps or harbors an animal, who has an animal in 16his or her care or acts as its custodian, or who knowingly 17permits a dog to remain on any premises occupied by him or her. 18"Owner" does not include a feral cat caretaker participating 19in a trap, spay/neuter, vaccinate for rabies, and return 20program. 21    "Offer for sale" means to sell, exchange for 22consideration, offer for adoption, advertise for the sale of, 23barter, auction, give away, or otherwise dispose of animals.24    "At retail to the public" means the selling or offering 25for sale, whether by appointment or otherwise, companion 26animals at a brick-and-mortar establishment that were obtained   SB1545- 6 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1from breeders or brokers for compensation and not bred on its 2premises. 3(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19; 101-295, eff. 8-9-19; 4102-586, eff. 2-23-22.) 5    (225 ILCS 605/10)  (from Ch. 8, par. 310)6    Sec. 10. Grounds for discipline. The Department may refuse 7to issue or renew or may suspend or revoke a license on any one 8or more of the following grounds:9        a. material misstatement in the application for 10    original license or in the application for any renewal 11    license under this Act;12        b. a violation of this Act or of any regulations or 13    rules issued pursuant thereto;14        c. aiding or abetting another in the violation of this 15    Act or of any regulation or rule issued pursuant thereto;16        d. allowing one's license under this Act to be used by 17    an unlicensed person;18        e. for licensees, conviction of any crime an essential 19    element of which is misstatement, fraud or dishonesty or 20    conviction of any felony, if the Department determines, 21    after investigation, that such person has not been 22    sufficiently rehabilitated to warrant the public trust; 23    for applicants, the Department may refuse to issue a 24    license based on a conviction of any felony or a 25    misdemeanor directly related to the practice of the   SB1545- 7 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1    profession if the Department determines in accordance with 2    Section 4 that such conviction will impair the ability of 3    the applicant to engage in the position for which a 4    license is sought; 5        f. conviction of a violation of any law of Illinois 6    except minor violations such as traffic violations and 7    violations not related to the disposition of dogs, cats 8    and other animals or any rule or regulation of the 9    Department relating to dogs or cats and sale thereof;10        g. making substantial misrepresentations or false 11    promises of a character likely to influence, persuade or 12    induce in connection with the business of a licensee under 13    this Act;14        h. pursuing a continued course of misrepresentation of 15    or making false promises through advertising, salesman, 16    agents or otherwise in connection with the business of a 17    licensee under this Act;18        i. failure to possess the necessary qualifications or 19    to meet the requirements of the Act for the issuance or 20    holding a license; or21        j. proof that the licensee is guilty of gross 22    negligence, incompetency, or cruelty with regard to 23    animals; or .24        k. operating without a proper license under this Act. 25    The Department may refuse to issue or may suspend the 26license of any person who fails to file a return, or to pay the   SB1545- 8 -LRB104 08814 AAS 18869 b1tax, penalty or interest shown in a filed return, or to pay any 2final assessment of tax, penalty or interest, as required by 3any tax Act administered by the Illinois Department of 4Revenue, until such time as the requirements of any such tax 5Act are satisfied.6    The Department may order any licensee to cease operation 7for a period not to exceed 72 hours to correct deficiencies in 8order to meet licensing requirements.9    If the Department revokes a license under this Act at an 10administrative hearing, the licensee and any individuals 11associated with that license shall be prohibited from applying 12for or obtaining a license under this Act for a minimum of 3 13years. 14(Source: P.A. 99-310, eff. 1-1-16; 100-286, eff. 1-1-18.)